Hawaii statutes.
PART IV.
UNEMPLOYMENT COMPENSATION

§209-41 Disaster unemployment benefits.
Whenever the governor declares a state disaster and invokes the provisions of
this part as provided in section 209-2, the maximum total benefits in a benefit
year as appearing in column D of section 383-22 for each high quarter wage
scale shall be increased by adding the product of thirteen multiplied by the
basic weekly benefit appearing in column B to the appropriate line of column D.

The extending benefits shall be allowed only
for individuals who reside in a rehabilitation area and shall be available for
only one benefit year which shall begin no later than one year following the
issuance of the governor's proclamation declaring a state disaster. [L 1961, c
189, §20; Supp, §98P-20; HRS §209-41]

Cross References

Other disaster
unemployment benefits, see chapter 385.

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next